Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2401
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-2401 to 43-2412 shall be known and may be cited as the Juvenile Services Act.

Laws 1990, LB 663, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 40;

Laws 2001, LB 640, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB670, § 9.